District of Columbia statutes.
1-604.05

Issuance of rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations proposed or issued pursuant to § 1-604.04, and amendments, shall be issued according to the provisions of § 2-505.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 405, 25 DCR 5740
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(b), 34 DCR 5079
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(b), 45 DCR 2464

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-611.08.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-604.5.
1973 Ed., § 1-334.5.